Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
GENERAL POWERS AND PROCEDURES DURING A SHORTAGE

Note

Part heading added by
L 1984, c 238, §1.

§125C-1 Findings and purpose. The
legislature finds that adequate supplies of petroleum products are essential to
the health, welfare, and safety of the people of Hawaii, and that any severe
disruption in petroleum product supplies for use within the State would cause
grave hardship, pose a threat to the economic well-being of the people of the
State, and have significant adverse effects upon public confidence and order
and effective conservation of petroleum products. The purpose of this chapter
is to grant to the governor or the governor's authorized representative the
clear authority, when shortages of petroleum products occur or are anticipated,
to control the distribution and sale of petroleum products in this State, to
procure such products, and to impose rules that will provide extraordinary
measures for the conservation of petroleum products and for their distribution
and sale in an orderly, efficient, and safe manner. [L 1975, c 38, pt of §1; am
L 1984, c 238, §2; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next